Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.040

Duties of vice president.

It shall be the duty of the vice president to perform all the duties of president in case of the president's absence or disability.

[ 1990 c 33 s 343; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.59.060. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 291 s 6; RRS s 4795. Formerly RCW 28A.59.060, 28.62.060.]